Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB312.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 401 of the act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the State Highway Law, is amended to read:Section 401. Duty on Department of Highways.--(a) The department shall construct or improve, and thereafter maintain and repair, at the cost and expense of the Commonwealth, the highways forming the plan or system of the State highways, in the several counties and townships. Such improvement and maintenance shall be made according to specifications to be prepared by the department, as regards the character, construction, and material to be used. The work of construction and maintenance of said State highways shall be done under the direction and supervision of the secretary. The secretary, in 123456789101112131415161718192021 addition to the powers conferred upon him in this act, shall enjoy and possess, in the construction and maintenance of State highways, all the rights and powers conferred by existing laws on supervisors or commissioners in townships in the construction or maintenance of township roads.(b) All State highways with a State route number consisting of two or three digits shall be resurfaced at least once every twenty-five (25) years and shall be improved and maintained in coordination with the department's engineering districts, metropolitan planning organizations and rural planning organizations. The department shall create a twenty-five-year plan for each engineering district for the resurfacing of all State highways with a State route number consisting of two or three digits in that district. During the penultimate year of the plan, any State highway that has not been resurfaced during that twenty-five-year period shall be prioritized immediately. The department shall publish a publicly available list of all State highways with a State route number consisting of two or three digits, organized by county, that includes the last year a complete or partial resurfacing was performed on each State highway.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0312PN0265 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122